Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-507
Trustees; drainage powers.

The board of trustees of any sanitary district organized under sections 31-501 to 31-523 shall have power to provide for the drainage of such district by laying out, establishing, maintaining and constructing one or more channels, drains or ditches for carrying off and disposing of the drainage and sewage of such district in a satisfactory manner, and for such purpose to straighten, widen, or deepen the channel of any stream, or remove any dam, so as to quicken and improve the flow of any stream, or effect satisfactory and efficient drainage.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 4, p. 289;

R.S.1913, § 1928;

C.S.1922, § 1869;

Laws 1927, c. 144, § 1, p. 390;

C.S.1929, § 31-607;

R.S.1943, § 31-507.